Hawaii statutes.
[§554G-11] Multiple transfers. If more
than one permitted transfer is made by means of the same trust instrument:

(1) The making of a subsequent permitted transfer
shall be disregarded in determining whether a creditor's claim with respect to
a prior permitted transfer is extinguished as provided in section 554G-8; and

(2) Any distribution to a beneficiary shall be deemed
to have been made from the latest permitted transfer. [L 2010, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next